Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5105.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 7401. (1) Except as authorized by this article, a person
shall not manufacture, create, deliver, or possess with intent to
manufacture, create, or deliver a controlled substance, a
prescription form, or a counterfeit prescription form. A
practitioner licensed by the administrator under this article shall
not dispense, prescribe, or administer a controlled substance for
other than legitimate and professionally recognized therapeutic or
scientific purposes or outside the scope of practice of the
practitioner, licensee, or applicant.
LEP H04432'25 (H-1) s4dyuw


(2) A person who violates this section as to:
(a) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1 or 2 that
is a narcotic drug or a drug described in section 7214(a)(iv) and:
(i) Which That is in an amount of 1,000 grams or more of any
mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine of not more
than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(ii) Which That is in an amount of 450 grams or more, but less
than 1,000 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is
guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment for not more than
30 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(iii) Which That is in an amount of 50 grams or more, but less
than 450 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty
of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years
or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(iv) Which That is in an amount less than 50 grams, of any
mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more
than $25,000.00, or both.
(b) Either of the following:
(i) A substance described in section 7212(1)(h) or 7214(c)(ii)
is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than
20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(ii) Any other controlled substance classified in schedule 1,
2, or 3, except marihuana or a substance listed in section
7212(1)(d), is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for
not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or
both.
(c) A substance classified in schedule 4 is guilty of a felony
LEP H04432'25 (H-1) s4dyuw


punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of
not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(d) Marihuana, a mixture containing marihuana, or a substance
listed in section 7212(1)(d) is guilty of a felony punishable crime
as follows:
(i) If the amount is 45 250 kilograms or more , or 200 500
plants or more, or if the amount is 25 kilograms or more of
marihuana concentrate, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $10,000,000.00, or
both.
(ii) If the amount is 5 200 kilograms or more but less than 45
250 kilograms , or 20 400 plants or more but fewer than 200 500
plants, or if the amount is 20 kilograms or more but less than 25
kilograms of marihuana concentrate, a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than 7 4 years or a fine of not more than
$500,000.00, $2,000,000.00, or both.
(iii) If the amount is less than 5 100 kilograms or more but
less than 200 kilograms or 200 plants or more but fewer than 20 400
plants, or if the amount is 10 kilograms or more but less than 20
kilograms of marihuana concentrate, a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than 4 3 years or a fine of not more than
$20,000.00, $500,000.00, or both.
(iv) If the amount is 50 kilograms or more but less than 100
kilograms or 100 plants or more but fewer than 200 plants, or if
the amount is 5 kilograms or more but less than 10 kilograms of
marihuana concentrate, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $80,000.00, or both.
(v) If the amount is 37.5 kilograms or more but less than 50
kilograms or 75 plants or more but fewer than 100 plants, or if the
LEP H04432'25 (H-1) s4dyuw


amount is 3.75 kilograms or more but less than 5 kilograms of
marihuana concentrate, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $60,000.00, or
both.
(vi) If the amount is more than 25 kilograms but less than 37.5
kilograms or more than 50 plants but fewer than 75 plants, or if
the amount is more than 2.5 kilograms but less than 3.75 kilograms
of marihuana concentrate, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $30,000.00, or
both.
(e) A substance classified in schedule 5 is guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of
not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(f) A prescription form or a counterfeit prescription form is
guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 7
years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(3) A term of imprisonment imposed under subsection (2)(a) may
be imposed to run consecutively with any term of imprisonment
imposed for the commission of another felony.
(4) If an individual was sentenced to lifetime probation under
subsection (2)(a)(iv) as it existed before March 1, 2003 and the
individual has served 5 or more years of that probationary period,
the probation officer for that individual may recommend to the
court that the court discharge the individual from probation. If an
individual's probation officer does not recommend discharge as
provided in this subsection, with notice to the prosecutor, the
individual may petition the court seeking resentencing under the
court rules. The court may discharge an individual from probation
as provided in this subsection. An individual may file more than 1
LEP H04432'25 (H-1) s4dyuw


motion seeking resentencing under this subsection.
(5) As used in this section, "plant" means a marihuana plant
that has produced cotyledons or a cutting of a marihuana plant that
has produced cotyledons.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5107 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
LEP H04432'25 (H-1) s4dyuw